Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6345.
people of the state of michigan enact: PART 174 LEAD FISHING TACKLE Sec. 17401. As used in this part: (a) "Jig" means a weighted fishing hook that measures less than 1.5 inches along its longest axis. (b) "Lead fishing tackle" means any of the following: (i) A sinker that contains 1 ounce or less of lead or a lead compound. (ii) A jig that contains lead or a lead compound. (iii) An item of fishing tackle, other than a jig or sinker, that contains lead or a lead compound. (c) "Person" means an individual or a partnership, corporation, limited liability company, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (d) "Sinker" means a device designed to be attached to a fishing line for the purpose of sinking the line. (e) "Waters of this state" means groundwaters, lakes, rivers, and streams and all other watercourses and waters, including the Great Lakes of this state. Sec. 17403. (1) Beginning January 1, 2028, a person shall not sell, offer for sale, or offer for promotional purposes any lead fishing tackle in this state. (2) Beginning January 1, 2029, a person shall not use any lead fishing tackle in the waters of this state. Sec. 17405. Beginning July 1, 2027, the department, in consultation with any other state department or agency that the department requests participate and that agrees to participate, shall implement an education and outreach program concerning the implementation and enforcement of this part. The program may include, but is not limited to, any of the following: (a) Providing information concerning the prohibitions contained in this section to the public with fishing licenses, through the department's website, or by any other means. (b) Encouraging fishing tackle manufacturers to provide more lead-free fishing tackle. (c) Coordinating lead-free fishing tackle swap events. (d) Providing information on and coordination of recycling or disposal sites for lead fishing tackle. (e) Providing general information on the dangers of lead fishing tackle to wildlife and humans. (f) Any other action the department considers appropriate to assist in, provide information on, or educate the public regarding the implementation and enforcement of this part. Sec. 17407. (1) The department shall enforce this part. (2) A person that violates this part is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 60 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both, plus the costs of prosecution.